Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2072.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.094, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Digital instruction. (a) An enrolling district may provide digital instruction, including blended instruction and online instruction, to the district's own enrolled students. Enrolling districts may establish agreements to provide digital instruction, including blended instruction and online instruction, to students enrolled in the cooperating schools. (b) When online instruction is provided, an online teacher as defined under subdivision 1, paragraph (h), shall perform all duties of teacher of record under Minnesota Rules, part 8710.0310. Unless the commissioner grants a waiver, a teacher providing online instruction shall not instruct more than 40 students in any one online learning course or section. (c) Students receiving online instruction full time shall be reported as enrolled in an online instructional site under subdivision 1, paragraph (g). (d) Curriculum used for digital instruction shall be aligned with Minnesota's current academic standards and benchmarks. (e) Digital instruction shall be accessible to students under sections 504 and 508 of the federal Rehabilitation Act and Title II of the federal Americans with Disabilities Act. (f) An enrolling district providing digital instruction and a supplemental online course provider shall assist an enrolled student whose family qualifies for the education tax credit under section 290.0674 to acquire computer hardware and educational software so they may participate in digital instruction. Funds provided to a family to support digital instruction or supplemental online courses may only be used for qualifying expenses as determined by the provider. Nonconsumable materials purchased with public education funds remain the property of the provider. Records for any funds provided must be available for review by the public or the department. (g) An enrolling district providing digital instruction shall establish and document procedures for determining attendance for membership and keep accurate records of daily attendance under section 120A.21. new text begin (h) An enrolling district providing digital instruction or a supplemental online course provider must conduct weekly wellness checks on their online instruction students. A wellness check may be conducted as part of the online instruction. A wellness check requires an adult to visibly see and communicate with a student in real time at least once a week to verify the well-being of the student. An adult conducting a wellness check must report any indication of abuse in accordance with chapter 260E regarding the reporting of maltreatment of minors. new text end